Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-3305
Department of Labor; powers; rules and regulations.

(1) The Department of Labor shall have the authority to administer the requirements of Title I of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, including, but not limited to, establishing accounting, monitoring, auditing, and reporting procedures and criteria in order to ensure state compliance with the objectives and requirements of Title I of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act.

(2) The department may adopt and promulgate any rules and regulations necessary to implement the Nebraska Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act.

Laws 2016, LB1110, § 5.